Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. PUBLIC RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

SUBTITLE D. JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM OF TEXAS PLAN ONE

CHAPTER 833. CREDITABLE SERVICE

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 833.001. TYPES OF CREDITABLE SERVICE. The types of service creditable in the retirement system are:

(1) membership service;

(2) military service; and

(3) equivalent membership service.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 43.001 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. ESTABLISHMENT OF SERVICE

Sec. 833.101. CURRENT SERVICE. Membership service is credited in the retirement system for each month in which a member holds a judicial office and for which the member makes the required contribution.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 43.101 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 833.102. SERVICE CREDIT PREVIOUSLY CANCELED. If a person who has withdrawn contributions to the retirement system and canceled service credit under Section 832.004 subsequently rejoins the retirement system, the member may not become eligible for retirement benefits from the retirement system unless the person redeposits with the system the amount withdrawn. Payment under this section reestablishes the service credit canceled by the refund.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 43.102 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 833.103. MILITARY SERVICE. (a) An eligible member may establish service credit in the retirement system for military service performed that is creditable in the retirement system.

(b) A member eligible to establish military service credit is one who:

(1) currently contributes to the retirement system;

(2) has at least 8 years of service credit in the retirement system; and

(3) does not receive and is not eligible to receive federal retirement payments based on 20 years or more of active federal military duty or its equivalent.

(c) Military service creditable in the retirement system is active duty federal military service.

(d) A member may establish one month of service credit for each month or fraction of a month of duty, but not more than 48 months of service credit in the retirement system for military service.

(e) A member may establish credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system a contribution computed for each month of military service claimed at the rate of six percent of the member's current monthly state salary.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 43.103 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 850, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 833.1031. MILITARY SERVICE CREDIT GOVERNED BY UNIFORMED SERVICES EMPLOYMENT AND REEMPLOYMENT RIGHTS ACT. The retirement system may adopt rules to comply with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act (38 U.S.C. Section 4301 et seq.) and other federal laws affecting the crediting of military service.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 36, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 833.1035. SERVICE IN EXCESS OF 20 YEARS. (a) Subject to the limitation on the amount of a retirement annuity under Section 834.102(c), an eligible member may establish service credit in the retirement system for service in excess of 20 years performed before September 1, 2005.

(b) A member eligible to establish credit under Subsection (a) is one who elects to make contributions under Section 835.1015.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308, Sec. 41(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

(d) A member may establish credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system a contribution computed for each month of qualifying service claimed at the rate of six percent of the member's current monthly state salary.

(e) The board of trustees may adopt rules to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1033 (H.B. 1114), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 2559), Sec. 41(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 833.105. ALTERNATIVE PAYMENTS TO ESTABLISH OR REESTABLISH SERVICE CREDIT. (a) The board of trustees may adopt rules to provide procedures for making installment payments to establish or reestablish credit in the retirement system as alternatives to lump-sum payments otherwise authorized or required by this subtitle. The methods may include payment by payroll deduction.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), payments may not be made under a rule adopted under this section:

(1) to establish or reestablish service credit of a person who has retired or died; or

(2) to establish current service under Section 833.101.

(c) Under a rule adopted under this section, the designated beneficiary of a deceased member or, if none exists, the personal representative of the decedent's estate may establish or reestablish service for which the member was eligible at the time of death if the establishment or reestablishment of the service would result in the payment of a death benefit annuity.

(d) The payment for the establishment or reestablishment of service under Subsection (c) must be made in a lump sum and completed before the first payment of a death benefit annuity but not later than the 60th day after the date the retirement system receives notice of the death.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 791, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 833.106. CREDIT FOR YEAR IN WHICH ELIGIBLE FOR OFFICE. (a) A member who has not retired may establish service credit in the retirement system for any calendar year during which the member:

(1) held an office included in the membership of the retirement system; or

(2) was eligible to take the oath for an office included in the membership of the retirement system.

(b) A member may establish service credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system a contribution computed for each month of credit claimed at the rate of six percent of the member's current monthly salary, plus, if the member does not establish credit before the first anniversary of the date of first eligibility, interest computed on the basis of the state fiscal year at an annual rate of 10 percent from the date of first eligibility to the date of deposit.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1240, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2002.